DI-32
DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for2UZ -FE)

DIAUI-01

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P0705 | Transmission Range Sensor Circuit Mal-
function (PRNDL Input)

DTC P0850 | Park/Neutral Switch Input Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The neutral start switch detects the shift lever range and sends signals to the Engine and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

(2-tripdetectionlogic)
« All switches are OFF simultaneously for P, R,N,D,3and 2

P0705 ranges.
* 2ormore switches are ON simultaneously for P, R, N, (D 4), « Shortin neutral start switch circuit
3 and (2 L) ranges. « Neutral start swital,
Neutral start switch remaines ON (P, Nrange) during driving *Engineand ECTECU
under conditions (a) and (b) for 30 sec. (2 -trip detectionlogic
P0850

(a) Vehicle speed: 70 km/h (44 mph) or more
(b) Engine speed: 1,500 - 2,500rpm
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WIRING DIAGRAM

Engine and ECT ECU
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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ-FE)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check neutral start switch.

PREPARATION:
(@) Jack up the vehicle.
(o) Disconnect the neutral start switch connector.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal shown below when the
shift lever is moved to each range.
OK:
Shift range Terminal No. to continuity | Terminal No. to continuity
N D06561 P 1-3 6-9
R 2-3 -
N 3-5 6-9
D, 4 3-7 -
3 3-4 _
2,L 3-8 -
NG Replace neutral start switch
(See page AT-7).
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2 Check transmission control switch.

PREPARATION:
NSSL NSSD (@ Connect the neutral start switch connector.
'M (b) Disconnect the shift lock control computer connector
LTeTelalala T (transmission control switch).
CHECK:
14131/2” 19918 Check continuity between each terminal of shift lock control

N - computer (transmission control switch).
= N oK:

P ATL D12645 Shift range Tester connection Specified valve
D No continuity
1 -8 (NSSD - AT4) —
4 Continuity
2 No continuity
6 - 12 (NSSL - ATL) —
L Continuity

NG Replace the transmission control switch
(See page AT-21).
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DIAGNOSTICS -

AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ-FE)

Engine and ECT ECU.

3 | Measure voltage between each terminals of NSW, P, R, N, D, 4, 3, 2, L and E1 of

ON D(+) L)

PREPARATION:

CHECK:

(@) Connect the shift lock control computer connector (trans-
mission control switch).
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

Measure voltage between each terminals NSW, P, R, N, D, 4,
3, 2, L and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU when the shift lever is
shifted to the following ranges.

(See page IN-38).

Repair or replace the harness or connector
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p
OK:
Tester connection Condition Specified condition
Shift lever range: P and N Below 1V
NSW = Body ground Shift lever range: Except P and N Battery voltage
P- Body ground Shift lever range: P Battery voltage
R - Body ground Shift lever range: R Battery voltage”
N - Body ground Shift lever range: N Battery voltage
D - Body ground Shift lever range: D and 4 Battery voltage
4 - Body ground Shift lever range: 4 Battery voltage
3 - Body ground Shift lever range: 3 Battery voltage
2 - Body ground Shift lever range: 2 and L Battery voltage
L - Body ground Shift lever range: L Battery voltage
HINT:
*: The voltage will drop slightly due to lighting up of the back up
light.
OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-38).
NG



